Arkansas, session 2025, SB118.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-100-103(2), concerning the definition of
"audiology", is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) “Audiology” means the application of principles, methods,
and procedures of measurement, testing, evaluation, prediction, consultation,
counseling, instruction, habilitation, or rehabilitation related to hearing
and balance disorders of the auditory system for the purpose of evaluating,
identifying, preventing, ameliorating, or modifying such disorders and
conditions in individuals and groups of individuals, including:
(i) Evaluating, diagnosing, managing, and treating
auditory or vestibular conditions in the human ear;
(ii) Prescribing, ordering, selling, dispensing, or
fitting hearing aids to an individual for the correction or relief of a
condition for which hearing aids are worn; and
(iii) Prescribing, ordering, selling, dispensing, or
externally fitting a sound processor to:
(a) An osseointegrated device for the
*JMB092*
03-17-2025 12:20:09 JMB092

As Engrossed: H3/17/25 SB118
correction or relief of a condition for which osseointegrated devices are
worn; or
(b) A cochlear implant for the correction or
relief of a condition for which cochlear implants are worn.
(B) "Audiology" includes:
(i) Conducting health screenings;
(ii) Removing a foreign body or cerumen from the
external auditory canal;
(iii) Ordering but not interpreting cultures and
bloodwork testing solely as relating to the auditory or vestibular conditions
in the human ear;
(iv) Ordering and performing in-office
nonradiographic testing of the external auditory canal solely for the
evaluation of hearing and balance disorders; and
(v) Ordering but not interpreting radiographic
imaging solely as relating to the auditory or vestibular conditions in the
human ear.
(C) "Audiology" does not include:
(i) Surgery using an instrument, including a laser,
scalpel, needle, cautery, cryoprobe, or suture, in which human tissue is cut,
burned, vaporized, removed, or otherwise permanently altered by mechanical
means, laser, ionizing radiation, ultrasound, or other means;
(ii) Osseointegrated device surgery;
(iii) Cochlear implant surgery;
(iv) The preparation, operation, or performance of
radiographic imaging; or
(v) The use or interpretation of cultures, bloodwork
testing, or radiographic imaging to diagnose or treat;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 17-100-103, concerning definitions relating
to speech-language pathologists and audiologists, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(9) "Sound processor" means a nonsurgical, external unit that
attaches to an internal osseointegrated device or cochlear implant.

/s/C. Penzo
03-17-2025 12:20:09 JMB092